Utah statutes.
31A-22-204.   Restriction on limitation of coverage.

No insurer may limit coverage under a policy insuring against legal liability to claims that are first made against the insured while the policy is in force, unless the policy contains on the cover page, a conspicuous statement that the coverage of the policy is limited in that way.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 1985 General Session

